West Virginia, session 2025, SB102.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. FORM AND EFFECT OF DEEDS AND CONTRACTS. §36-3-5. Form of deed. (a) A deed may be made in the following form, or to the same effect: "This deed made the ........ day of ........., in the year ........, between (here insert names of parties), witnesseth: That in consideration of (here state the consideration), the said ............... grants unto the said ............... all, etc. (Here describe the property, and insert covenants or any other provisions.) Witness the following signature."(b) All deeds, except for a transfer on death deed made pursuant to §39-12-1 et seq. of this code, and transfers between parent and child for consideration of less than $2,000, shall contain the notarized acknowledgement of the grantee evidencing the acceptance of the conveyance of the real property being conveyed by the deed. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home